Illinois, session 104th, SB96.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.24a and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.24a new)7    Sec. 10-20.24a. Nonpublic school student participation in 8athletic activities. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, 9a school board must allow a student who resides in the school 10district but attends a nonpublic school, including a 11home-schooled student, to participate in extracurricular 12athletic activities sponsored by the school district without 13being required to enroll or complete coursework at a public 14school within the school district if the student's parent or 15guardian is paying real estate taxes on property owned by the 16parent or guardian that is located within the school district 17and provides satisfactory proof of such to the school 18district.  19    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)20    Sec. 34-18.88. Nonpublic school student participation in 21athletic activities. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, 22the board must allow a student who resides in the school   SB0096- 2 -LRB104 04018 LNS 14042 b1district but attends a nonpublic school, including a 2home-schooled student, to participate in extracurricular 3athletic activities sponsored by the school district without 4being required to enroll or complete coursework at a public 5school within the school district if the student's parent or 6guardian is paying real estate taxes on property owned by the 7parent or guardian that is located within the school district 8and provides satisfactory proof of such to the school 9district. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.